Washington statutes.
RCW 15.92.110

Commission on integrated pest management—Receipt of gifts, grants, and endowments.

The commission on integrated pest management, and Washington State University on behalf of the commission, may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be used from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the commission and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

[ 2023 c 37 s 5; 1995 c 390 s 7.]